es: Tipo de tejido de algodón: Paño; Lona/loneta; Punto de jersey; Muselina; Popelina; Satén; Sarga; Otro
en: Cotton weave type: Broadcloth; Canvas/duck; Jersey knit; Muslin; Poplin; Sateen; Twill; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de tecido de algodão: Tricoline; Lona; Malha Jersey; Musseline; Popeline; Cetim de algodão; Sarja; Outros
hr-HR: Vrsta pamučnog tkanja: Fino platno; Platno / kanvas; Žersej pletivo; Muslin; Popelin; Saten; Keper; Ostalo
el: Τύπος ύφανσης βαμβακιού: Broadcloth; Καμβάς/duck; Πλεκτό ζέρσεϊ; Μουσελίνα; Ποπλίνα; Σατέν; Τουίλ (Twill); Άλλο
lt-LT: Medvilnės audimo tipas: Drobelė; Drobė / burinis audinys; Džersio trikotažas; Muslinas; Poplinas; Satinas; Ruoželinis audinys; Kita
sk-SK: Tkaninová štruktúra bavlny: Bavlnené plátno; Plátno/celtovina; Džersej; Mušelín; Popelín; Satén; Keper; Iné
sv: Bomullsvävtyp: Broadcloth; Kanvas/segelduk; Jerseystickning; Muslin; Poplin; Satäng; Twill; Övrigt
nl: Katoen weeftype: Broadcloth; Canvas/duck; Jersey; Mousseline; Popeline; Satijnkatoen; Twill; Overige
zh-TW: 棉布織法類型: 平布; 帆布/粗帆布; 平紋針織布; 細平布; 府綢; 棉緞; 斜紋布; 其他
tr: Pamuklu dokuma türü: Çuha; Kanvas/çadır bezi; Jarse örgü; Müslin; Poplin; Pamuklu saten; Dimi örgü; Diğer
vi: Loại dệt cotton: Vải khổ rộng; Vải canvas/duck; Vải thun jersey; Vải muslin; Vải poplin; Vải lụa sateen; Vải chéo twill; Khác
hu: Pamut szövéstípusa: Posztó; Vászon/zsávolyvászon; Kötött jersey; Muszlin; Poplin; Pamutszatén; Sávolykötés; Egyéb
pl: Typ splotu bawełny: Sukno; Płótno (Canvas/Duck); Dżersej; Muślin; Popelina; Satyna; Splot skośny (twill); Inny
ru: Тип переплетения хлопка: Броадклот; Парусина/холст; Трикотаж джерси; Муслин; Поплин; Сатин; Твил (саржевое переплетение); Другое
ro-RO: Tip de țesătură din bumbac: Pânză fină; Canvas / dril; Tricot jerseu; Muselină; Poplin; Satin din bumbac; Twill; Altele
bg-BG: Вид памучно тъкане: Броудклот; Канвас/брезент; Жарсе; Муселин; Поплин; Сатен; Кепър; Други
ja: 綿織物タイプ: ブロードクロス; キャンバス / ダック; ジャージーニット; モスリン; ポプリン; サテン; ツイル; その他
fr: Type de tissage en coton: Drap fin; Toile/coutil; Tricot en jersey; Mousseline; Popeline; Satin de coton; Sergé; Autre
th: ประเภทการทอผ้าฝ้าย: ผ้าบรอดคลาส; ผ้าแคนวาส/ผ้าดั๊ก; ผ้านิตเจอร์ซีย์; ผ้ามัสลิน; ผ้าป๊อปลิน; ผ้าซาติน; ผ้าทวิล; อื่นๆ
nb: Bomullsvevtype: Tettvevd bomull; Lerret/duck; Jerseystrikk; Musselin; Poplin; Sateng; Twill; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta tkanja bombaža: Sukno; Platno/jadrničevina; Džersi; Muslin; Poplin; Saten; Keper; Drugo
fi: Puuvillakudostyyppi: Puuvillapalttina; Kanvas/purjekangas; Jersey-neulos; Musliini; Popliini; Satiini; Twill; Muu
zh-CN: 棉织物组织类型: 细平布; 帆布/粗帆布; 平纹针织; 细薄棉布; 府绸; 棉缎; 斜纹布; 其他
ko: 면직물 종류: 브로드클로스; 캔버스/덕; 저지 니트; 머슬린; 포플린; 사틴; 트윌; 기타
it: Tipo di tessitura del cotone: Broadcloth; Tela/duck; Maglia jersey; Mussola; Popeline; Raso di cotone; Twill; Altro
da: Bomuldsvævningstype: Fastvævet bomuld; Kanvas/sejldug; Jersey-strik; Musselin; Poplin; Satin; Twill; Andet
de: Baumwollwebart: Feintuch; Leinwand/Segeltuch; Jersey-Strick; Musselin; Popeline; Satin; Köperbindung; Andere
cs: Typ vazby bavlny: Sukno; Plátno; Žerzejový úplet; Mušelín; Popelín; Satén; Kepr; Ostatní
pt-PT: Tipo de tecido de algodão: Pano largo; Lona/lona grossa; Malha jersey; Musselina; Popelina; Cetim de algodão; Sarja; Outro